District of Columbia statutes.
49-216

Use of Fort Lesley J. McNair.

National Guard shall have the use of the drill grounds and rifle range at Fort Lesley J. McNair, subject to the approval of the Secretary of the Army, and the Commanding General of the militia shall provide such additional targets and accessories as may be necessary for the use of the militia.

History

Mar. 1, 1889, 25 Stat. 778, ch. 328, § 44
renumbered Feb. 18, 1909, 35 Stat. 634, ch. 146, § 47

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 39-216.
1973 Ed., § 39-516.